Rhode Island statutes. Title 4 Animals and Animal Husbandry
Chapter 22 Cat Identification Program

4-22-1.
Findings and purpose.

The state finds that a cat identification program, which would require an owner of a cat to maintain an identification for the cat, would serve the following public purposes:

Cat identification would provide cats protection under the law, equal to that afforded dogs, by establishing ownership which, in turn, would encourage cat owners to take full responsibility for their pets’ welfare.

Cat identification would protect cats, as dogs are now protected, by establishing minimum holding periods for cats released to and/or impounded by municipal animal control facilities and private animal shelters.

A program to require cat identification should facilitate the return of lost, owned cats.

Cat identification would provide a method to help distinguish between owned and unowned cat populations thus assisting animal control officers and animal shelters in carrying out their mission.

Cat identification would advance the reduction of the untold suffering of cats at-large in our state by helping to insure the quick return of injured and sick animals to their owners.

Passage of this bill would reduce the number of unowned cats and increase education to owners as to the need for sterilization of cats, thereby reducing unwanted litters, eliminating cat over-population problems, and reducing the costs to cities and towns for euthanizing at-large or unowned cats.

Cat identification would help support public health and safety in the control of rabies.

The purpose of this chapter, therefore, is to establish a cat identification program, which would require that an owner of a cat maintain an identification for the cat. These measures will also reduce the spread of rabies.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 291, § 1.

4-22-2.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter:

“At-large” means: (1) On the premises of a person other than an owner of the cat, without the consent of an occupant or owner of such premises, or (2) on a public street or highway, on public or private school grounds, or in any other public place, except when under the physical control of an owner.

“Feral cat” means any wild, unsocialized or untamed cat.

“Guardian” shall mean a person(s) having the same rights and responsibilities of an owner, and both terms shall be used interchangeably. A guardian shall also mean a person who possesses, has title to or an interest in, harbors or has control, custody or possession of an animal and who is responsible for an animal’s safety and well being.

“Identification” means: a traceable form of identification such as (1) a collar and a flat or hanging tag worn by a cat which includes the current name, address and telephone number of the owner, or (2) a rabies vaccination tax, or (3) an ear tag issued by a licensed veterinarian or by a licensed animal shelter or licensed municipal pound, or (4) a registered microchip which is used in conjunction with a visible collar and tag or in conjunction with a faceted, reflective ear stud, or (5) a tag from a licensed animal shelter or licensed municipal pound, or (6) a tattoo registered with the National Dog Registry or other similar national tattoo service, or (7) a cat license issued by a Rhode Island city or town, or (8) a collar incorporating embroidery as a type of information labeling rather than a hanging or flat tag or (9) in the case of feral cats, a tipped or notched ear in conjunction with a microchip or any of the above other forms of identification. The intent is to allow flexibility in the types of identification available for cats and to incorporate other types of cat identification in the future as they are developed.

“Impounded cat” means any cat released to or under the custody of or control of a licensed animal shelter or licensed municipal pound.

“Owner” means (1) any person who keeps, has permanent custody, owns, maintains, harbors, provides care or sustenance for, has control or charge of or responsibility for a cat or who permits a cat to habitually be or remain on or be lodged or fed within such person’s property or premises, and (2) any refusal to permit any animal control officer to impound such cat shall be deemed evidence of ownership unless ownership of the cat by another party is established.

“Person” means an individual, firm, jointstock company, partnership, association, private, or municipal corporation, state, commission, political subdivision, a state, any interstate body or the federal government or any agency or subdivision thereof.

“Roaming cat” means any homeless socialized cat or any stray socialized cat.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 291, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 72, § 12.

4-22-3.
Required cat identification.

It shall be unlawful for any person to be an owner of a cat over three months of age unless the person maintains an identification worn by the cat at all times.

The identification provisions in this law are not applicable to the following:

A cat brought into the state exclusively for the purpose of entering them in a cat show or cat exhibition or for breeding purposes and which does not remain in this state for more than fifteen (15) days and which is not allowed to be at large.

A cat owned by any person who is not a resident of the state and is traveling through the state temporarily and for a period not to exceed thirty (30) days.

A cat temporarily kept by a licensed veterinarian, a licensed kennel, or a licensed animal shelter or a licensed municipal pound who maintain on their premises cats owned by others.

A cat temporarily kept by owners of a licensed pet shop for purposes of sale or by a licensed animal shelter or a licensed municipal pound for purposes of adoption.

A cat kept exclusively indoors or confined in outdoor areas and maintained for pedigreed cat breeding and stud purposes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 291, § 1.

4-22-4.
Removal of cat identification.

It shall be unlawful for any person other than an animal control officer, a licensed veterinarian, an employee of a licensed animal shelter, an employee of a licensed municipal pound, or a person authorized by an animal control officer to remove any identification from any cat not owned by the person.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 291, § 1.

4-22-5.
Holding at-large or impounded cats.

In the case of any at-large or roaming or feral cat released to or impounded in a licensed animal shelter or licensed municipal pound wearing any form of identification specified in the definitions section the animal shelter or pound shall make a reasonable attempt to notify the owner by telephone, or by sending written notice to the owner. The at-large or roaming or feral cat shall be held by the animal shelter or pound for not less than five days, after which time the animal shelter or pound may offer the cat for adoption, sale or otherwise dispose of the cat, if not sooner recovered by the owner. The five days shall not include any day or part thereof that the public pound or animal shelter is not open for a specified period of time, not to be less than one-half the normal hours of business. An owner wishing to recover the cat shall pay the reasonable and customary daily impoundment fees and other associated fees for each full day, or fraction thereof, that the cat is held by the animal shelter or pound. The provisions of this section relating to the five (5) day holding period shall not be deemed to apply to any cat which, impounded hereunder, was injured or maimed, and after the cat has been examined by a licensed veterinarian who shall confirm, in writing, that the cat be destroyed for humanitarian purposes.

In the case of any at-large or roaming or feral cat released to or impounded in a licensed animal shelter or licensed municipal pound not wearing any form of identification as specified in the definitions section, the animal shelter or pound shall hold the at-large or roaming or feral cat for not less than two (2) days, after which time the animal shelter or pound may offer the cat for adoption, sale or otherwise dispose of the cat, if not sooner recovered by a person claiming ownership. The two (2) days shall not include any day or part thereof that the public pound or animal shelter is not open for a specified period of time, not to be less than one-half the normal hours of business. The owner or keeper of any cat so impounded shall pay the reasonable and customary daily impoundment fees and other associated fees for each full day, or fraction thereof, that the cat is held at the animal shelter or pound. The provisions of this section relating to the two (2) day holding period shall not be deemed to apply to any cat which, impounded hereunder, was injured or maimed, and after the cat has been examined by a licensed veterinarian who shall confirm, in writing, that the cat be destroyed for humanitarian purposes.

If an at-large or roaming or feral cat without identification released to or impounded in a licensed animal shelter or a licensed municipal pound is dangerous and presents a danger to the safety of shelter personnel, the cat may be euthanized prior to the expiration of its holding period at the discretion of an animal control officer, a licensed veterinarian or the shelter management.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 291, § 1.

4-22-6.
Enforcement.

An impounded at-large, roaming, or feral cat not wearing any identification may not be released to the owner of the cat until the owner complies with the identification requirements of this article.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 291, § 1.

4-22-7.
Violations.

Any animal control officer, and his agents, may issue to any person in violation of this section a notice of violation. Persons who violate any provision of this section shall be subject to a fine as defined under §

4-13-1

per violation per animal. Each and every incidence which goes unremedied for thirty (30) days after written notice of violation hereunder shall constitute a subsequent offense and subsequent fines will apply.

All fines collected under this section will be remitted to the town clerk or city clerk of the municipality where the violation was issued. Such fines shall be used by the municipality only for enforcing animal control laws or ordinances or for programs to house and care for cats.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 291, § 1.

4-22-8.
Authorization to impound cats.

Animal control officers and their agents are authorized and empowered to impound any roaming or feral cat at-large and to dispose of the same pursuant to the provisions of §

4-19-12

. Licensed animal shelters are authorized to accept any roaming or feral cat released to them for impoundment and to dispose of the same pursuant to the provisions of §

4-19-12

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 291, § 1.

4-22-9.
Adoption of municipal ordinance.

No provision of this chapter shall prohibit any city or town from adopting any provision of this chapter as a municipal ordinance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 291, § 1.

4-22-10.
Use of the terms owner or guardian.

Wherever the word “owner” shall appear in this chapter it shall also mean and may be interchanged with the word “guardian” as defined in §

4-22-2

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 72, § 13.